Utah statutes.
31A-22-801.   Scope of part.

(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), all life insurance and accident and health insurance in connection with loans or other credit transactions are subject to this part.

(2) (a)  Insurance in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of more than 10 years duration is not subject to this part, but is subject to other provisions of this title.

(b)  Isolated transactions on the part of an insurer that are not related to an agreement or plan for insuring debtors of the creditor are not subject to this part.

